app/utils/MuseScoreWindows/tables/da-dk-g26_1993.ctb
endword -af 36-1-124
begword af- 1-124-36
endword -altid 36-1-2345-145
begword altid- 1-2345-145-36
endword -at 36-1-2345
endword -a 36-6-1
begword at- 1-2345-36
endword -og 36-135-1245
endword -c 36-6-14
begword og- 135-1245-36
endword -du 36-145-136
endword -d 36-6-145
begword du- 145-136-36
endword -efter 36-15-124-2345-156
endword -z 36-6-1356
begword efter- 15-124-2345-156-36
midword -efter- 36-1356-36
endword -e 36-6-15
endword -for 36-124-1346
endword -f 36-6-124
begword for- 124-1346-36
endword -fra 36-124-1235-1
begword fra- 124-1235-1-36
endword -g 36-6-1245
endword -gennem 36-1245-126-1246-134
begword gennem- 1245-126-1246-134-36
endword -ham 36-125-1-134
begword ham- 125-1-134-36
endword -han 36-125-1-1345
endword -y 36-6-13456
begword han- 125-1-1345-36
endword -har 36-125-1-1235
endword -h 36-6-125
begword har- 125-1-1235-36
endword -hun 36-125-136-1345
endword -u 36-6-136
begword hun- 125-136-1345-36
endword -j 36-6-245
endword -kan 36-13-1-1345
endword -k 36-6-13
begword kan- 13-1-1345-36
endword -lige 36-123-24-12456
endword -l 36-6-123
begword lige- 123-24-12456-36
endword -med 36-146-145
endword -m 36-6-134
begword med- 146-145-36
endword -men 36-134-126
begword men- 134-126-36
 endword -ned 36-1246-145
begword ned- 1246-145-36
endword -når 36-1345-16-1235
endword -n 36-6-1345
begword når- 1345-16-1235-36
endword -op 36-135-1234
endword -o 36-6-135
begword op- 135-1234-36
endword -over 36-135-1236-156
endword -x 36-6-1346
begword over- 135-1236-156-36
endword -på 36-1234-16
endword -p 36-6-1234
begword på- 1234-16-36
midword -på- 36-1234-36
endword -ret 36-1235-346
begword ret- 1235-346-36
midword -ret- 36-12356-36
endword -rigtig 36-1235-35-2345-35
endword -r 36-6-1235
begword rigtig- 1235-35-2345-35-36
midword -rigtig- 36-1235-36
endword -skal 36-123456-1-123
begword skal- 123456-1-123-36
midword -skal- 36-123456-36
endword -som 36-234-135-134
endword -s 36-6-234
begword som- 234-135-134-36
midword -som- 36-234-36
endword -så 36-234-16
endword -å 36-6-16
begword så- 234-16-36
endword -til 36-2345-24-123
endword -t 36-6-2345
begword til- 2345-24-123-36
midword -til- 36-2345-36
endword -under 36-136-1345-23456
begword under- 136-1345-23456-36
midword -under- 36-12345-36
endword -ved 36-1236-15-145
endword -v 36-6-1236
begword ved- 1236-15-145-36
midword -ved- 36-1236-36


### Context rules - forward translation

# Exclamation at beginning of string
noback context `["!"] @6-235

# Ensure two dashes where appropriate.
noback context $w["-"]$w @36
noback context $sw["-"]"\xf800\xf801" @36
noback context $sw["-"]$sw @36-36
noback context `["-"]$sw @36-36
noback context $sw["-"]~ @36-36
noback context !$sw["-"]~ @36
noback context `["-"]~ @36-36

# Ensure letsign between letter and numsign
noback context $l[]$D @6


### context - backward translation

# Ensure the correct number of dashes
nofor context @36[@36-36] "--"
nofor context [@36-36]@36 "--"
nofor context $w[@36-36]$w "--"
nofor context $sw[@36-36]$sw "-"
nofor context `[@36-36]$sw "-"
nofor context $sw[@36-36]~ "-"
nofor context `@36-36~ "-"


### Pass 2 - forward translation

# No "nd", "hv", "or", or "st" after a digit and a letsign
noback pass2 @234f-123f-2456 @6-125-1236
noback pass2 @234f-123f-12345 @6-1345-145
noback pass2 @234f-123f-1346 @6-135-1235
noback pass2 @234f-123f-1356 @6-234-2345
noback pass2 @234f-123f-1256 @6-2345-15
# extra lines to correct hyphenation errors caused by \xf801
noback pass2 @234f-123f-135-3456-1235 @6-135-1236-156
noback pass2 @234f-123f-3456 @6-1236-15

noback pass2 @234f-123f @6

# Correct chars defined as 8 dots because they include letsign
noback pass2 @467 @45-6
noback pass2 @4568 @45-456
noback pass2 @123457 @6-12345
noback pass2 @24567 @6-2456
noback pass2 @13467 @6-1346
noback pass2 @13567 @6-1356
noback pass2 @12567 @6-1256

noback pass2 @6-5 @5 # no letsign before letters with accent
noback pass2 @6-46-5 @46-5 # no letsign before cap letters with accent
noback pass2 @234f-123f-46-5 @46-5 # no letsign before cap letters with accent
noback pass2 _$D[@6-46-6] *
noback pass2 _$D[@6-46] *
noback pass2 @6-46-6 @46-6 # Ensure correct order and no double letsign
noback pass2 @6-46 @46-6 # Ensure correct order

 ### Pass 2 - backward

# Insert letsign between number (with extra punctuation) and capsletter sign
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@3$l.@3[]@46 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@3[]@46 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$Spm[]@46 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm[]@46 @6

# Insert letsign between number (with extra punctuation) and capsword sign
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@3$l.@3[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@34$l.@34[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@36$l.@36[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@3[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@34[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$l.@36[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm$Spm[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.$Spm[]@456 @6
#nofor pass2 @3456$l.[]@456 @6

#nofor pass2 $l[]@46 @6
#nofor pass2 $a[]@456 @6

### Pass 3 - forward translation

# Ensure there is only one letsign
 noback pass3 @6-6 @6

# Ensure there is only one emphasis sign
noback pass3 @56-56 @56
noback pass3 @56-56-56 @56


### Pass 3 - backward translation

# Save letters that have been defined with letsign as part of their definitions
nofor pass3 @6-12345 @123457
nofor pass3 @6-2456 @24567
nofor pass3 @6-1346 @13467
nofor pass3 @6-1356 @13567
nofor pass3 @6-1256 @6-12567

# save ~ and |  before inserting extra letsigns and endcapsword in pass 2.
nofor pass3 @45-6 @467 # Create alternative representation of "~"
nofor pass3 @45-456 @4568

# Include hyphenation file as the last thing
include da-dk-g2_1993.dic
